src/third_party/hunspell/tests/complexprefixesutf.aff
# Coptic example by Moheb Mekhaiel
# Encoded with the new Coptic character encoding of Unicode 4.1
SET UTF-8

# set twofold prefix stripping
COMPLEXPREFIXES

PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 ⲧⲉⲕ .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 ⲙⲉⲧ/A .
